Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 1. Generally

§ 6601.
Respondent as witness.

In the trial of complaints, informations, indictments and other proceedings against persons charged with crimes or offenses, the person so charged shall, at his or her own request and not otherwise, be deemed a competent witness.
The credit to be given to his or her testimony shall be left solely to the jury, under the instructions of the court but the failure of such person to testify shall not be a matter of comment to the jury by either the court or the prosecutor and shall not be considered by the jury as evidence against him or her.

§ 6602.
Repealed. 1973, No. 118, § 25, eff. Oct. 1, 1973.

§ 6603.
Failure to obey summons to testify.

A person legally summoned to attend a court in this State to testify in a criminal cause, who willfully or wrongfully refuses to attend and testify, shall be fined not less than $10.00 nor more than $100.00 or imprisoned not more than six months, or both.

§ 6604.
Counseling or aiding in nonattendance of witness.

A person who knowingly and wrongfully counsels, aids, or assists a person so summoned to testify, to absent himself or herself from attendance before such court, shall be fined not more than $50.00 nor less than $10.00.

§ 6605.
Recognizance by witness; commitment.

In a proceeding before a court or magistrate for the investigation or prosecution of a criminal offense, the court or magistrate may order any witness appearing before such court or magistrate to enter into a sufficient recognizance with surety for his or her appearance before any court or magistrate where his or her attendance in such investigation or prosecution is necessary.
If the witness refuses to enter into such recognizance with surety, he or she may be committed to jail in the county where his or her attendance as a witness is required, on a warrant of the court or magistrate making the order, and there detained until such time as his or her attendance to testify is required.

§ 6606.
Separate examination of witnesses.

On the trial of a person for a criminal offense or on the examination of a person charged therewith before a Criminal Division of the Superior Court, on the request of the prosecuting attorney or the party accused, the court shall have the witnesses examined separately and apart from each other.

HISTORY:

Amended 1965, No. 194, § 10, operative February 1, 1967; 1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 54, eff. April 9, 1974; 2009, No. 154, § 238.

§ 6607.
Disclosure of confidential records; notice to prosecution.

When a defendant seeks access to a victim’s school records, or to any other records of a victim that are by law confidential, the defendant shall provide written notice to the prosecutor that the records have been requested prior to the service of any subpoena requesting the records.

HISTORY:

Added 2007, No. 40, § 11.